fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-4w-mihko_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lokup

Tests:
  
  Noun - mihko - ok : # -m inanimate noun, blood AEW NI4w
     mihko+N+I+Sg: mihko
     mihko+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: nimihkom
     mihko+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg: kimihkom
     mihko+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg: nimihkominân
     mihko+N+I+Px21Pl+Sg: kimihkominaw
     mihko+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg: kimihkomiwâw
     mihko+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: omihkom
     mihko+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg: omihkomiwâw
     mihko+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: omihkomiyiw

     mihko+N+I+Loc: mihkohk
     mihko+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc: nimihkomihk
     mihko+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc: kimihkomihk
     mihko+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc: nimihkominâhk
     mihko+N+I+Px21Pl+Loc: kimihkominâhk
     mihko+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc: kimihkomiwâhk
     mihko+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc: omihkomihk
     mihko+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc: omihkomiwâhk
     mihko+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: omihkomiyihk

     mihko+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg:          [mihkos,         mihkosis]
     mihko+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg:    [nimihkomis,       nimihkomisis]
     mihko+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kimihkomis,       kimihkomisis]
     mihko+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg:    [nimihkomisinân,   nimihkomisisinân]
     mihko+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kimihkomisinaw,   kimihkomisisinaw]
     mihko+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kimihkomisiwâw,   kimihkomisisiwâw]
     mihko+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg:    [omihkomis,        omihkomisis]
     mihko+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg:    [omihkomisiwâw,    omihkomisisiwâw]
     mihko+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: [omihkomisiyiw,    omihkomisisiyiw]
